Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 82.16.046 (ExemptionsâOperation of state route No. 16) and 1998 c 179 s 5;(2) RCW 82.29A.132 (ExemptionsâOperation of state route No. 16) and 1998 c 179 s 6;(3) RCW 82.45.190 (ExemptionsâState route No. 16 corridor transportation systems and facilities) and 1998 c 179 s 7;(4) RCW 82.08.02566 (ExemptionsâSales of tangible personal property incorporated in prototype for parts, auxiliary equipment, and aircraft modificationâLimitations on yearly exemption) and 2003 c 168 s 208, 1997 c 302 s 1, & 1996 c 247 s 4;(5) RCW 82.12.02566 (ExemptionsâUse of tangible personal property incorporated in prototype for aircraft parts, auxiliary equipment, and aircraft modificationâLimitations on yearly exemption) and 2003 c 168 s 209, 1997 c 302 s 2, & 1996 c 247 s 5;(6) RCW 82.08.02568 (ExemptionsâSales of carbon and similar substances that become an ingredient or component of anodes or cathodes used in producing aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 1;(7) RCW 82.12.02568 (ExemptionsâUse of carbon and similar substances that become an ingredient or component of anodes or cathodes used in producing aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 2;(8) RCW 82.04.4482 (CreditâSales of electricity or gas to an aluminum smelter) and 2004 c 24 s 9;(9) RCW 82.16.0498 (CreditâSales of electricity or gas to an aluminum smelter) and 2004 c 24 s 13;(10) RCW 82.12.0265 (ExemptionsâUse by bailee of tangible personal property consumed in research, development, etc., activities) and 1980 c 37 s 64;(11) RCW 36.100.090 (Tax deferralâNew public facilities) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 6;(12) RCW 82.12.024 (Deferral of use tax on certain users of natural or manufactured gas) and 2001 c 214 s 10;(13) RCW 82.04.545 (ExemptionsâSales of electricity or gas to silicon smelters) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 705 & 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 704;(14) RCW 82.16.315 (ExemptionsâSales of electricity or gas to silicon smelters) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 703 & 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 702;(15) RCW 82.16.0495 (CreditâElectricity sold to a direct service industrial customer) and 2001 c 214 s 11;(16) RCW 36.102.070 (Deferral of taxesâApplication by public stadium authorityâDepartment of revenue approvalâRepaymentâSchedulesâInterestâDebt for taxesâInformation not confidential) and 1997 c 220 s 201;(17) RCW 82.08.02569 (ExemptionsâSales of tangible personal property related to a building or structure that is an integral part of a laser interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and 1996 c 113 s 1;(18) RCW 82.12.02569 (ExemptionsâUse of tangible personal property related to a building or structure that is an integral part of a laser interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and 1996 c 113 s 2;(19) RCW 82.04.421 (ExemptionsâOut-of-state membership sales in discount programs) and 1997 c 408 s 1;(20) RCW 82.04.4331 (DeductionsâInsurance claims for state health care coverage) and 1988 c 107 s 33;(21) RCW 82.04.4295 (DeductionsâManufacturing activities completed outside the United States) and 1980 c 37 s 15;(22) RCW 82.04.447 (CreditâNatural or manufactured gas purchased by direct service industrial customersâReports) and 2001 c 214 s 9;(23) RCW 84.36.047 (Nonprofit organization property used for transmission or reception of radio or television signals originally broadcast by governmental agencies) and 1984 c 220 s 4 & 1977 ex.s. c 348 s 1;(24) RCW 82.04.367 (ExemptionsâNonprofit organizations that are guarantee agencies, issue debt, or provide guarantees for student loans) and 1998 c 324 s 1 & 1987 c 433 s 1;(25) RCW 82.23B.030 (Exemption) and 2015 c 274 s 15, 1992 c 73 s 9, & 1991 c 200 s 803;(26) RCW 82.08.965 (ExemptionsâSemiconductor materials manufacturing) and 2024 c 261 s 5;(27) RCW 82.12.965 (ExemptionsâSemiconductor materials manufacturing) and 2024 c 261 s 7;(28) RCW 82.08.970 (ExemptionsâGases and chemicals used to manufacture semiconductor materials) and 2024 c 261 s 6;(29) RCW 82.12.970 (ExemptionsâGases and chemicals used to manufacture semiconductor materials) and 2024 c 261 s 8;(30) RCW 82.04.448 (CreditâManufacturing semiconductor materials) and 2024 c 261 s 4;(31) RCW 82.04.426 (ExemptionsâSemiconductor microchips) and 2024 c 261 s 3;(32) RCW 82.04.4332 (DeductionsâTuition fees of foreign degree-granting institutions) and 1993 c 181 s 10;(33) RCW 82.29A.137 (ExemptionsâCertain leasehold interests related to the manufacture of superefficient airplanes) and 2017 c 135 s 35, 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 13, 2010 c 114 s 134, & 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 13; and(34) RCW 82.04.434 (CreditâPublic safety standards and testing) and 1991 c 13 s 1.Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.050 and 2021 c 296 s 8 and 2021 c 143 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or(iv) ((Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or(v))) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or(((vi)))(v) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (((vi)))(v) of this subsection following such use.(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;(b) Credit bureau services;(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW, or, until July 1, 2022, chapter 18.57A RCW;(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:(i) Custom software; or(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;(v) Batting cage activities;(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.216.010;(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed 21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age 18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.(16)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the purchase or acquisition of tangible personal property and specified services by a person who receives either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or 82.16.320 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, except for transactions excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" or "retail sale" by any other provision of this section. Nothing in this subsection (16) may be construed to limit the application of any other provision of this section to purchases by a recipient of either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, or by any other person.(b) For purposes of this subsection (16), "specified services" means:(i) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation;(ii) The clearing of land or the moving of earth, whether or not associated with activities described in (b)(i) of this subsection (16);(iii) The razing or moving of existing buildings or structures; and(iv) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services.Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.110 and 2009 c 535 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, "manufacturer" means every person who, either directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, manufactures for sale or for commercial or industrial use from his or her own materials or ingredients any articles, substances, or commodities.(2)(((a))) When the owner of equipment or facilities furnishes, or sells to the customer prior to manufacture, all or a portion of the materials that become a part or whole of the manufactured article, the department shall prescribe equitable rules for determining tax liability.(((b) A person who produces aluminum master alloys is a processor for hire rather than a manufacturer, regardless of the portion of the aluminum provided by that person's customer. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "aluminum master alloy" means an alloy registered with the aluminum association as a grain refiner or a hardener alloy using the American national standards institute designating system H35.3.))(3) A nonresident of this state who is the owner of materials processed for it in this state by a processor for hire shall not be deemed to be engaged in business in this state as a manufacturer because of the performance of such processing work for it in this state.(4) The owner of materials from which a nuclear fuel assembly is made for it by a processor for hire shall not be subject to tax under this chapter as a manufacturer of the fuel assembly.(5) For purposes of this section, the terms "articles," "substances," "materials," "ingredients," and "commodities" do not include digital goods.Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.120 and 2019 c 202 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or industrial use, and includes:(a) The production or fabrication of special made or custom made articles;(b) The production or fabrication of dental appliances, devices, restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory products by a dental laboratory or dental technician;(c) Cutting, delimbing, and measuring of felled, cut, or taken trees;(d) Crushing and/or blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel, or ore;(e) The production of compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas for use as a transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310; and(f) The production or processing of renewable natural gas.(2) "To manufacture" does not include:(a) Conditioning of seed for use in planting; cubing hay or alfalfa;(b) Activities which consist of cutting, grading, or ice glazing seafood which has been cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state;(c) The growing, harvesting, or producing of agricultural products;(d) ((Packing of agricultural products, including sorting, washing, rinsing, grading, waxing, treating with fungicide, packaging, chilling, or placing in controlled atmospheric storage;(e))) The production of digital goods;(((f)))(e) The production of computer software if the computer software is delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media, including the delivery by use of a tangible storage media where the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to the purchaser; and(((g)))(f) Except as provided in subsection (1)(((e)))(d) of this section, any activity that is integral to any public service business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 and with respect to which the gross income associated with such activity: (i) Is subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW; or (ii) would be subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW if such activity were conducted in this state or if not for an exemption or deduction.(3) With respect to wastewater treatment facilities:(a) "To manufacture" does not include the treatment of wastewater, the production of reclaimed water, and the production of class B biosolids; and(b) "To manufacture" does include the production of class A or exceptional quality biosolids, but only with respect to the processing activities that occur after the biosolids have reached class B standards.Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.260 and 2023 c 422 s 5 and 2023 c 286 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;(b) ((Beginning July 1, 2035, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;(c)))(i) Except as provided otherwise in (((c)))(b)(iii) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2035, until January 1, 2046, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(((c)))(b), "dairy products" means:(A) Products, not including any cannabis-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and(B) Products comprised of not less than 70 percent dairy products that qualify under (((c)))(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(((c)))(b) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;(((d)))(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2035, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(((d)))(c), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products; and(((e)))(d) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.(3) ((Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(4))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.(((5)))(4)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was $250,000 or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than $250,000; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019, and 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019.(((6)))(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.(((7)))(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.(((8)))(7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.(((9)))(8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(((10)))(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.(((11)))(10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; and(iii) Beginning April 1, 2020, 0.484 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10). The tax rate in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a)(iii) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a).(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11)))(10) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10):(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and(B) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(b).(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11)))(10), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as that rate remains 0.484 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and 0.484 percent, respectively.(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10) must be reduced to 0.357 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least 60 days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (((11)))(10)(e).(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10).(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least 50,000 full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.(((12)))(11)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within 30 months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than 50 percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having 50 percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.(v) "Timber products" means:(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((12)))(11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(g) Nothing in this subsection (((12)))(11) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).(((13)))(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.260 and 2023 c 422 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;(b) ((Beginning July 1, 2035, seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;(c)))(i) Except as provided otherwise in (((c)))(b)(iii) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2035, until January 1, 2046, dairy products; or selling dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(((c)))(b), "dairy products" means:(A) Products, not including any cannabis-infused product, that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and(B) Products comprised of not less than 70 percent dairy products that qualify under (((c)))(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by weight or volume.(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this subsection (1)(((c)))(b) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy product;(((d)))(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2035, fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(((d)))(c), "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products; and(((e)))(d) Wood biomass fuel; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel that is produced from lignocellulosic feedstocks, including wood, forest, or field residue and dedicated energy crops, and that does not include wood treated with chemical preservations such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.(3) ((Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(4))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.(((5)))(4)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was $250,000 or less; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator and whose annual taxable amount for the prior calendar year from such business was more than $250,000; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent through June 30, 2019, and 0.9 percent beginning July 1, 2019.(((6)))(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.(((7)))(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.(((8)))(7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 70A.380.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 70A.384 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.(((9)))(8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(((10)))(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.(((11)))(10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007, through March 31, 2020; and(iii) Beginning April 1, 2020, 0.484 percent, subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10). The tax rate in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a)(iii) applies to all business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(a).(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11)))(10) and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:(i) 0.2904 percent through March 31, 2020; and(ii) Beginning April 1, 2020, the following rates, which are subject to any reduction required under (e) of this subsection (((11)))(10):(A) The rate under RCW 82.04.250(1) on the business of making retail sales of tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and(B) 0.484 percent on all other business activities described in this subsection (((11)))(10)(b).(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11)))(10), "commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.(d)(i) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534. However, this requirement does not apply to persons reporting under the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as that rate remains 0.484 percent, or under any of the tax rates in (b)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (((11)))(10), so long as those tax rates remain the rate imposed pursuant to RCW 82.04.250(1) and 0.484 percent, respectively.(ii) Nothing in (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) may be construed as affecting the obligation of a person reporting under a tax rate provided in this subsection (((11)))(10) to file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534: (A) Pursuant to another provision of this title as a result of claiming a tax credit or exemption; or (B) pursuant to (d)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) as a result of claiming the tax rates in (a)(ii) or (b)(i) of this subsection (((11)))(10) for periods ending before April 1, 2020.(e)(i) After March 31, 2021, the tax rates under (a)(iii) and (b)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10) must be reduced to 0.357 percent provided the conditions in RCW 82.04.2602 are met. The effective date of the rates authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) must occur on the first day of the next calendar quarter that is at least 60 days after the department receives the last of the two written notices pursuant to RCW 82.04.2602 (3) and (4).(ii) Both a significant commercial airplane manufacturer separately and the rest of the aerospace industry as a whole, receiving the rate of 0.357 percent under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e) are subject to the aerospace apprenticeship utilization rates required under RCW 49.04.220 by April 1, 2026, or five years after the effective date of the 0.357 percent rate authorized under this subsection (((11)))(10)(e), whichever is later, as determined by the department of labor and industries.(iii) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this subsection (((11)))(10)(e).(f)(i) Except as provided in (f)(ii) of this subsection (((11)))(10), this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this subsection (((11)))(10) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited outside the state of Washington. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) only applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850. This subsection (((11)))(10)(f)(ii) continues to apply during the time that a person is subject to the tax rate in (a)(iii) of this subsection (((11)))(10).(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "a significant commercial airplane manufacturer" means a manufacturer of commercial airplanes with at least 50,000 full-time employees in Washington as of January 1, 2021.(((12)))(11)(a) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(b) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into timber products or wood products; (ii) timber products into other timber products or wood products; or (iii) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1); as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(c) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from timber or other timber products; (iii) wood products manufactured by that person from timber or timber products; or (iv) products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, wood products, or products defined in RCW 19.27.570(1) multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2045.(d) Until July 1, 2045, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(d), "selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is required to sever the timber within 30 months from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after severance.(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products containing, by weight or volume, more than 50 percent recycled paper and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue; kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard, liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of printed materials.(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having 50 percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12)))(11)(e)(iii), "postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035.(v) "Timber products" means:(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered paper or paper products; and(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of biocomposite surface products.(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood windows; and biocomposite surface products.(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((12)))(11) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(g) Nothing in this subsection (((12)))(11) may be construed to affect the taxation of any activity defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c), defined as a wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060(2), or taxed under RCW 82.04.280(1)(g).(((13)))(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(((14)))(13)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent until July 1, 2024, and 0.484 percent thereafter.(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (((14)))(13) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.4282 and 2009 c 535 s 410 are each amended to read as follows:In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax amounts derived from bona fide (1) initiation fees, (2) dues, (3) contributions, (4) donations, (5) tuition fees, (6) charges made by a nonprofit trade or professional organization for attending or occupying space at a trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show, convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public, and (7) charges made for operation of privately operated kindergartens((, and (8) endowment funds)). This section may not be construed to exempt any person, association, or society from tax liability upon selling tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, or upon providing facilities or other services for which a special charge is made to members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to members without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of such goods or services shall not be considered as a deduction under this section.Sec. 8. RCW 82.04.43395 and 2023 c 313 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An accountable community of health may deduct from the measure of tax delivery system reform incentive payments, medicaid transformation project funding, or both, distributed by the Washington state health care authority, as described in Sec. 1115 medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00304/0, as approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services in accordance with Sec. 1115(a) of the social security act.(2) A hospital that is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision, or a hospital that is affiliated with a state institution, may deduct from the measure of tax ((either or both of the following:(a) Incentive))incentive payments received through the medicaid quality improvement program established through 42 C.F.R. 438.6(b)(2)((;(b) Delivery system reform incentive payments, medicaid transformation project funding, or both, received through the project described in Sec. 1115 medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00304/0, approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services in accordance with Sec. 1115(a) of the social security act)).(3) Managed care organizations may deduct from the measure of tax the incentive payments received for achieving quality performance standards established through 42 C.F.R. 438.6(b)(2), as existing on July 28, 2019.(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Accountable community of health" means a regional nonprofit designated by the health care authority to work together with the health care delivery system, health plans, public health, social services, community-based organizations, the justice system, schools, tribal partners, and local government leaders to improve the health equity of their communities as part of Sec. 1115 medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00304/0.(b) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 74.60.010.Sec. 9. RCW 82.12.022 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as a consumer.(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.(3) ((The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.(4))) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.(((5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2027.(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(6)))(4) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.(((7) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by a silicon smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.16.315.(8)))(5) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.(((9)))(6) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the consumer to the department.(((10)))(7) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the department may require by rule.(((11)))(8) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.Sec. 10. RCW 82.12.022 and 2017 c 135 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as a consumer.(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.(3) ((The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.(4))) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.(((5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2027.(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5) must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.(6)))(4) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in RCW 82.16.310.(((7)))(5) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.(((8)))(6) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the consumer to the department.(((9)))(7) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the department may require by rule.(((10)))(8) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.Sec. 11. RCW 82.21.040 and 2024 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The following are exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:(1) Any successive possession of a previously taxed hazardous substance. If tax due under this chapter has not been paid with respect to a hazardous substance, the department may collect the tax from any person who has had possession of the hazardous substance. If the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having taxable possession of a hazardous substance, the amount of tax paid shall constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable possession to the person who paid the tax.(2) Any possession of a hazardous substance by a natural person under circumstances where the substance is used, or is to be used, for a personal or domestic purpose (and not for any business purpose) by that person or a relative of, or person residing in the same dwelling as, that person.(3) Any possession of a hazardous substance amount which is determined as minimal by the department of ecology and which is possessed by a retailer for the purpose of making sales to ultimate consumers. This exemption does not apply to pesticide or petroleum products.(4) ((Any possession of alumina or natural gas.(5)))(a) Until January 1, 2028, any possession of a hazardous substance as defined in RCW 82.21.020(1)(c) that is solely for use by a farmer or certified applicator as an agricultural crop protection product and warehoused in this state or transported to or from this state, provided that the person possessing the substance does not otherwise use, manufacture, package for sale, or sell the substance in this state.(b) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(i) "Agricultural crop protection product" means a chemical regulated under the federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 as amended as of September 1, 2015, when used to prevent, destroy, repel, mitigate, or control predators, diseases, weeds, or other pests.(ii) "Certified applicator" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 17.21.020.(iii) "Farmer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.213.(iv) "Manufacturing" includes mixing or combining agricultural crop protection products with other chemicals or other agricultural crop protection products.(v) "Package for sale" includes transferring agricultural crop protection products from one container to another, including the transfer of fumigants and other liquid or gaseous chemicals from one tank to another.(vi) "Use" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.12.010.(((6)))(5) Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing under the United States Constitution.Sec. 12. RCW 82.23A.030 and 1989 c 383 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:The following are exempt from the tax imposed in this chapter:(1) Any successive possession of a previously taxed petroleum product. If tax due under this chapter has not been paid with respect to a petroleum product, the department may collect the tax from any person who has had possession of the petroleum product. If the tax is paid by any person other than the first person having taxable possession of a petroleum product, the amount of tax paid shall constitute a debt owed by the first person having taxable possession to the person who paid the tax.(2) Any possession of a petroleum product by a natural person under circumstances where the substance is used, or is to be used, for a personal or domestic purpose (and not for any business purpose) by that person or a relative of, or person residing in the same dwelling as, that person.(3) Persons or activities which the state is prohibited from taxing under the United States Constitution.(4) ((Any persons possessing a petroleum product where such possession first occurred before July 1, 1989.(5))) Any possession of (a) natural gas, (b) petroleum coke, or (c) liquid fuel or fuel gas used in petroleum processing.(((6)))(5) Any possession of petroleum products that are exported for use or sale outside this state as fuel.(((7)))(6) Any possession of petroleum products packaged for sale to ultimate consumers.Sec. 13. RCW 82.29A.130 and 2023 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The following leasehold interests are exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any public utility that is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof but only if income qualification exists for such housing.(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions. However, this exemption does not apply to the leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned property.(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States. However, this exemption applies only where it is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to 90 percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(g).(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less than $250 per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor are deemed a single leasehold interest.(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the leased property for a continuous period of less than 30 days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of the same property to the same lessee are deemed a single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest is deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than 30 days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional, temporary basis.(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway or building.(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public owner of the property and a contractor.(12) ((All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.(13))) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational activities for persons with disabilities of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 must be imposed and must be apportioned accordingly.(((14)))(13) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county with a population of over 1,000,000, that has a seating capacity of over 40,000, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.(((15)))(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (((14)))(13) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.(((16)))(15) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.(((17)))(16) All leasehold interests in property that is: (a) Owned by the United States government or a municipal corporation; (b) listed on any federal or state register of historical sites; and (c) wholly contained within a designated national historic reserve under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 461.(((18)))(17) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of an amphitheater if a private entity is responsible for 100 percent of the cost of constructing the amphitheater which is not reimbursed by the public owner, both the public owner and the private lessee sponsor events at the facility on a regular basis, the lessee is responsible under the lease or agreement to operate and maintain the facility, and the amphitheater has a seating capacity of over 17,000 reserved and general admission seats and is in a county that had a population of over 350,000, but less than 425,000 when the amphitheater first opened to the public.For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" include box offices or other ticket sales areas, entrance gates, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas including lawn seating areas and suites, stages, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include office areas used predominately by the lessee.(((19)))(18) All leasehold interests in real property used for the placement of military housing meeting the requirements of RCW 84.36.665.(((20)))(19) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a community college or technical college, which leasehold interest provides:(a) Food services for students, faculty, and staff;(b) The operation of a bookstore on campus; or(c) Maintenance, operational, or administrative services to the community college or technical college.(((21)))(20)(a) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of an arena if it:(i) Has a seating capacity of more than 2,000;(ii) Is located on city-owned land; and(iii) Is owned by a city with a population over 200,000 within a county with a population of less than 1,500,000.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (((21)))(20), "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as provided in subsection (((18)))(17) of this section.(((22)))(21) All leasehold interests in facilities owned by the state parks and recreation commission that are listed on the national register of historic places or the Washington heritage register.(((23)))(22)(a) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of an arena if:(i) The arena has a seating capacity of more than 4,000;(ii) The arena is located on city-owned land;(iii) The arena is located within a city with a population over 100,000; and(iv) Private entities were responsible for 100 percent of the cost of constructing improvements to the arena, which were not reimbursed by the public owner.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (((23)))(22), "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as provided in subsection (((18)))(17) of this section, except that it also includes office areas used predominately by the lessee.(c) A taxpayer claiming an exemption under this subsection (((23)))(22) must file a complete annual tax performance report as provided in RCW 82.32.534.(d) This subsection (((23)))(22) does not apply to leasehold interests on or after October 1, 2033.Sec. 14. RCW 82.29A.130 and 2019 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The following leasehold interests are exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any public utility that is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof but only if income qualification exists for such housing.(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions. However, this exemption does not apply to the leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned property.(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States. However, this exemption applies only where it is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(g).(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor are deemed a single leasehold interest.(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of the same property to the same lessee are deemed a single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest is deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional, temporary basis.(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway or building.(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public owner of the property and a contractor.(12) ((All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.(13))) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational activities for persons with disabilities of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 must be imposed and must be apportioned accordingly.(((14)))(13) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.(((15)))(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (((14)))(13) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.(((16)))(15) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.(((17)))(16) All leasehold interests in property that is: (a) Owned by the United States government or a municipal corporation; (b) listed on any federal or state register of historical sites; and (c) wholly contained within a designated national historic reserve under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 461.(((18)))(17) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of an amphitheater if a private entity is responsible for one hundred percent of the cost of constructing the amphitheater which is not reimbursed by the public owner, both the public owner and the private lessee sponsor events at the facility on a regular basis, the lessee is responsible under the lease or agreement to operate and maintain the facility, and the amphitheater has a seating capacity of over seventeen thousand reserved and general admission seats and is in a county that had a population of over three hundred fifty thousand, but less than four hundred twenty-five thousand when the amphitheater first opened to the public.For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" include box offices or other ticket sales areas, entrance gates, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas including lawn seating areas and suites, stages, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include office areas used predominately by the lessee.(((19)))(18) All leasehold interests in real property used for the placement of military housing meeting the requirements of RCW 84.36.665.(((20)))(19) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a community college or technical college, which leasehold interest provides:(a) Food services for students, faculty, and staff;(b) The operation of a bookstore on campus; or(c) Maintenance, operational, or administrative services to the community college or technical college.(((21)))(20)(a) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of an arena if it:(i) Has a seating capacity of more than two thousand;(ii) Is located on city-owned land; and(iii) Is owned by a city with a population over two hundred thousand within a county with a population of less than one million five hundred thousand.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (((21)))(20), "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as provided in subsection (((18)))(17) of this section.Sec. 15. RCW 82.45.010 and 2022 c 199 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any thirty-six month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a thirty-six month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) ((A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m))) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(((n)))(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(((o)))(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(((p)))(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(((q)))(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (((q)))(p)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a thirty-six month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (((q)))(p)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(((q)))(p)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(((q)))(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(((r)))(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(((s)))(r)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(((s)))(r), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(((s)))(r) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(((s)))(r); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(((s)))(r); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(((s)))(r) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(((t)))(s)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for fifty years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(((t)))(s) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(((t)))(s) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(((u)))(t)(i) The sale by an affordable homeownership facilitator of self-help housing to a low-income household.(ii) The definitions in this subsection (3)(((u)))(t) apply to this subsection (3)(((u)))(t) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(A) "Affordable homeownership facilitator" means a nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of October 1, 2019, and that is the developer of self-help housing.(B) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed eighty percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.(C) "Self-help housing" means dwelling residences provided for ownership by low-income individuals and families whose ownership requirement includes labor participation. "Self-help housing" does not include residential rental housing provided on a commercial basis to the general public.(((v)))(u)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(((v)))(u), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCW 82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required to pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (((v)))(u)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (((v)))(u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(((v)))(u), "low-income" has the same meaning as in (((u)))(t) of this subsection.Sec. 16. RCW 82.45.010 and 2022 c 199 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any thirty-six month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a thirty-six month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.(3) The term "sale" does not include:(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.(l) ((A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.(m))) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.(((n)))(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.(((o)))(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.(((p)))(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.(((q)))(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(ii) However, the transfer described in (((q)))(p)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a thirty-six month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (((q)))(p)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(((q)))(p)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(((q)))(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.(((r)))(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.(((s)))(r)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(((s)))(r), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.(iii) This subsection (3)(((s)))(r) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(((s)))(r); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(((s)))(r); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(((s)))(r) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.(((t)))(s)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for fifty years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(((t)))(s) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.(iii) A "qualified entity" is:(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(((t)))(s) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.(((u)))(t)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(((u)))(t), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.200, within three years:(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCW 82.32.050.(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required to pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (((u)))(t)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (((u)))(t)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(((u)))(t), "low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.Sec. 17. RCW 82.45.030 and 2011 c 58 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this chapter, the term "selling price" means the true and fair value of the property conveyed. If property has been conveyed in an arm's length transaction between unrelated persons for a valuable consideration, a rebuttable presumption exists that the selling price is equal to the total consideration paid or contracted to be paid to the transferor, or to another for the transferor's benefit.(2) If the sale is a transfer of a controlling interest in an entity with an interest in real property located in this state, the selling price shall be the true and fair value of the real property owned by the entity and located in this state. If the true and fair value of the real property located in this state cannot reasonably be determined, the selling price shall be determined according to subsection (4) of this section.(3) As used in this section, "total consideration paid or contracted to be paid" includes money or anything of value, paid or delivered or contracted to be paid or delivered in return for the sale, and shall include the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract indebtedness, or other incumbrance, either given to secure the purchase price, or any part thereof, or remaining unpaid on such property at the time of sale.Total consideration shall not include the amount of any outstanding lien or incumbrance in favor of the United States, the state, or a municipal corporation for taxes, special benefits, or improvements.((When a transfer or conveyance is made by deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a deed of trust, total consideration shall not include the amount of any relocation assistance provided to the transferor.))(4) If the total consideration for the sale cannot be ascertained or the true and fair value of the property to be valued at the time of the sale cannot reasonably be determined, the market value assessment for the property maintained on the county property tax rolls at the time of the sale shall be used as the selling price.Sec. 18. RCW 82.64.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 907 are each amended to read as follows:The following are exempt from the taxes imposed in this chapter:(1) Any successive sale of a previously taxed syrup.(2) Any syrup that is transferred to a point outside the state for use outside the state. The department shall provide by rule appropriate procedures and exemption certificates for the administration of this exemption.(((3) Any sale at wholesale of a trademarked syrup by any person to a person commonly known as a bottler who is appointed by the owner of the trademark to manufacture, distribute, and sell such trademarked syrup within a specified geographic territory.(4) Any sale of syrup in respect to which a tax on the privilege of possession was paid under this chapter before June 1, 1991.))Sec. 19. RCW 84.36.010 and 2020 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the state, or any county or municipal corporation; all property belonging exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe, if (a) the tribe is located in the state, and (b) the property is used exclusively for essential government services; ((all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW;)) all property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded agreement granting immediate possession and use to the public bodies listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; and, for a period of forty years from acquisition, all property of a community center; is exempt from taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Community center" means property, including a building or buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a district by a local school board, and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit organization for the purposes of converting them into community facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for community members. The community center may make space available to businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of space in or on the property.(b) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic development.(c) "Economic development" means commercial activities, including those that facilitate the creation or retention of businesses or jobs, or that improve the standard of living or economic health of tribal communities.Sec. 20. RCW 84.36.030 and 2014 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The following real and personal property is exempt from taxation:(1)(a) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations, organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social services directed at persons of all ages.(b) The sale of donated merchandise is not considered a nonexempt use of the property under this section if the proceeds are devoted to the furtherance of the purposes of the selling organization or association as specified in this subsection (1).(2) Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of churches, or an organization or association, the membership of which is comprised solely of churches or their qualified representatives, which is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised recreational activities and church purposes as related to such camp facilities. The exemption provided by this ((paragraph))subsection shall apply to a maximum of two hundred acres of any such camp as selected by the church, including buildings and other improvements thereon.(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses, provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good: PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of this ((paragraph))subsection, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years, then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified pursuant to this section.(4) Property owned by all organizations and societies of veterans of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the department of defense, which shall have national charters, and which shall have for their general purposes and objects the preservation of the memories and associations incident to their war service and the consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and to patriotic and community service to state and nation. To be exempt such property must be used in such manner as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes and objects of such societies.(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods, and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for preventing the same.(6) ((Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies under the federal guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide or acquire student loans.(7))) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as otherwise provided in this section or RCW 84.36.805.(((8)))(7) For the purposes of this section, "general public good" means members of the community derive a benefit from the rental or use of the property by the nonprofit community group or organization.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 21. Section 5 of this act expires January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 22. Section 6 of this act takes effect January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. The contingent expiration date in section 1407, chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. applies to section 9 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. Section 10 of this act takes effect when section 9 of this act expires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 25. Section 13 of this act expires January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 26. Section 14 of this act takes effect January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 27. Section 15 of this act expires January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. Section 16 of this act takes effect January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 29. Except for sections 6, 10, 14, and 16 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---